Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4339
Act, how construed.

The Intergovernmental Risk Management Act, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be construed liberally to effect its purpose.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 39.